Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-1008 Subsequent
administration. If other property of the estate is discovered after an
estate has been settled and the personal representative discharged or after one
year after a closing statement has been filed, the court upon petition of any interested
person and upon notice as it directs may appoint the same or a successor
personal representative to administer the subsequently discovered estate. If a
new appointment is made, unless the court orders otherwise, the provisions of
this chapter apply as appropriate; but no claim previously barred may be
asserted in the subsequent administration. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Newly discovered assets, see HPR rule 86.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next